Hawaii statutes.
[§88-29.5] Investment
personnel. The board may, through its executive director, appoint one or
more investment officers, under the direction of the chief investment officer,
prescribing their duties and qualifications and fixing their salaries, who shall
be exempt from chapter 76. [L 2013, c 23, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next